src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!************************************************************************** 
!                   T Y P E   4
!                   -----------
!       All syncopated in the plural
!
!       Mostly syncopated in Fem Gen Sg.
!       Slenderised in Masc Gen Sg,
!
!**************************************************************************  
!
!**************************************************************************  
!
!       C O N T I N U A T I O N     C L A S S E S
!
!**************************************************************************  
LEXICON Adj1-1
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D2A_sg;     !!!GEN/COMPARATIVE
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj   PL-A;
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj   PL-A-SLENDER;
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj      PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj    PL-A;
+Adj+Voc:^Adj           PL-A;


LEXICON Adj1-2
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D2A_sg;
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj   PL-A;
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj   PL-A-SLENDER;
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj      PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj    PL-A;
+Adj+Voc:^Adj           PL-A;


LEXICON Adj1-3
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D2B_sg;
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj   PL-A;
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj   PL-A-SLENDER;
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj      PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj    PL-A;
+Adj+Voc:^Adj           PL-A;


LEXICON Adj1-4
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D2C_sg; 
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj   PL-A;
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj   PL-A-SLENDER;
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj      PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj    PL-A;
+Adj+Voc:^Adj           PL-A;


LEXICON Adj1-5
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D2D_sg; 
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj   PL-A;
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj   PL-A-SLENDER;
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj      PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj    PL-A;
+Adj+Voc:^Adj           PL-A;


LEXICON Adj2-1
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D3_sg;  
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj^Lea   PL-A;
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj^Lea   PL-A-SLENDER;
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj          PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj^Lea    PL-A;
+Adj+Voc:^Adj^Lea           PL-A;


LEXICON Adj2-2
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D2A_sg; 
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj   PL-E;
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj   PL-E-SLENDER;
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj      PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj    PL-E;
+Adj+Voc:^Adj           PL-E;

! REMOVING THESE VARIATIONS ! 30/6/05
LEXICON Adj3-1
Basic;
+Adj+Comp:0 #;
!+Comp+Len:^Sé  #;
+Adj+Comp+Len:^Adj^Sé   #;
!+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj      Fem_nom_voc_sg;
!+Adj:^Adj      Fem_gen-D4_sg;  
!+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj      Fem_nom_voc_sg;

!+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj     Masc_nom_sg;
!+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj     Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;
!+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj     Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg;

!+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj  PL-TADA;
!+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj  PL-SLENDER;
!+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj     PL-TADA;
!+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj   PL-TADA;
!+Adj+Voc:^Adj          PL-TADA;


LEXICON Adj4-1
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj^Coim  Fem_gen-D2A_sg;     ! sync + slen + e
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj^Coim  PL-A;           !sync+a
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj^Coim  PL-A-SLENDER;   !sé+sync+a
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj          PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj^Coim   PL-A;           !sync+a
+Adj+Voc:^Adj^Coim          PL-A;           !sync+a

LEXICON Adj4-2
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj       Fem_gen-D2A_sg;     ! slen + e
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj^Coim  PL-A;           !sync+a
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj^Coim  PL-A-SLENDER;   !sé+sync+a
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj          PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj^Coim   PL-A;           !sync+a
+Adj+Voc:^Adj^Coim          PL-A;           !sync+a


LEXICON Adj4-3
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj^Coim  Fem_gen-D2A_sg;     ! sync + slen + e
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj^Coim^Caol PL-E;           !sync+slen +e
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj^Coim^Caol PL-E-SLENDER;   !sé+sync+slen +e
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj              PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj^Coim^Caol  PL-E;           !sync+slen +e
+Adj+Voc:^Adj^Coim^Caol         PL-E;           !sync+slen +e

LEXICON Adj4-4
Basic;
+Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;
+Adj:^Adj^Coim  Fem_gen-D3_sg;      ! sync + a
+Adj+Fem+Voc:^Adj       Fem_nom_voc_sg;

+Adj+Masc+Com:^Adj      Masc_nom_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Gen:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;
+Adj+Masc+Voc:^Adj      Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg;

+Adj+Com+NotSlen:^Adj^Coim  PL-A;           !sync+a
+Adj+Com+Slender:^Adj^Coim  PL-A-SLENDER;   !sé+sync+a
+Adj+Gen+Weak:^Adj          PL-TADA;
+Adj+Gen+Strong:^Adj^Coim   PL-A;           !sync+a
+Adj+Voc:^Adj^Coim          PL-A;           !sync+a




!**************************************************************************
!ADJECTIVES QUALIFYING FEM SINGULAR NOUNS


LEXICON Fem_nom_voc_sg
!! adj following a fem. noun is always lenited (^Sé) regardless of whether 
!! the preceding noun is lenited or eclipsed (neither ??)
!! as is the vocative after vocative particle "a"

+Sg+Len:^Sé     #;

!! SAME FORM IS USED FOR COMPARATIVE AND FEM GEN SG

LEXICON Fem_gen-D2A_sg          ! like Noun Declension 2
+Fem+Gen+Sg:^Caole  #;
+Comp:^Caole    #;
!+Comp+Len:^Caole^Sé    #;
+Comp+Len:^Caole^Sé #;


LEXICON Fem_gen-D2B_sg          ! like Noun Declension 2 but without "e" appended
+Fem+Gen+Sg:^Ath    #;
+Comp:^Ath  #;
!+Comp+Len:^Ath^Sé  #;
+Comp+Len:^Ath^Sé   #;


LEXICON Fem_gen-D2C_sg          ! a new change
+Fem+Gen+Sg:^Aththí #;
+Comp:^Aththí   #;
!+Comp+Len:^Aththí^Sé   #;
+Comp+Len:^Aththí^Sé    #;


LEXICON Fem_gen-D2D_sg          ! a new change
+Fem+Gen+Sg:^Aththaí    #;
+Comp:^Aththaí  #;
!+Comp+Len:^Aththaí^Sé  #;
+Comp+Len:^Aththaí^Sé   #;

LEXICON Fem_gen-D3_sg           ! like Noun Declension 3
+Fem+Gen+Sg:^Leaa   #;
+Comp:^Leaa #;
!+Comp+Len:^Leaa^Sé #;
+Comp+Len:^Leaa^Sé  #;

LEXICON Fem_gen-D4_sg           ! like Noun Declension 4 (no change)
+Fem+Gen+Sg:0   #;
+Comp:0 #;
!+Comp+Len:^Sé  #;
+Comp+Len:^Sé   #;



!ADJECTIVES QUALIFYING MASC SINGULARNOUNS
