src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjA
ramhar		Adj4-1;		!fat
folamh		Adj4-1;		!empty
bodhar		Adj4-2;		!deaf
umhal		Adj4-2;		!humble
tirim		Adj4-2;		!dry			! plurals should be tiorma not tirma see FIX file
dílis		Adj4-3;		!loyal
íseal		Adj4-3;		!low
LEXICON AdjC
astralaíoch	Adj1-4;	 ! gsm ~ astrological
beacht	Adj1-1;	 ! gsm ~ exact, precise,
cásach	Adj1-3;	 ! honoured, venerable, respectful
dearóil	Adj2-2;	 ! frail, puny; cold, bleak;
díbheo	Adj3-1;	 ! lifeless, listless, moribund
fann	Adj1-1;	 ! gsm ~ faint, weak,
féithuar	Adj1-2;	 ! nippy, chilly
iondúil	Adj2-1;	 ! usual, customary, go h~
máchaileach	Adj1-3;	 ! blemished, defective
míchruinn	Adj2-2;	 ! inexact, inaccurate
ríoraíoch	Adj1-4;	 ! gsm ~ dynastic
sciobalta	Adj3-1;	 ! smart, spruce; prompt
tapúil	Adj2-1;	 ! speedy, active
tartmhar	Adj1-2;	 ! thirsty; thirst-provoking
urghnách	Adj1-5;	 ! (of meetings, etc) extraordinary
áthasach	Adj1-3;	 ! glad, joyful
LEXICON Adj-FGB1
béalbhinn		Adj2-2;
donndearg		Adj1-2;
éiceolaíoch		Adj1-4;	 ! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -íche, npl ~a)
ireannach		Adj1-3;
garbhchumtha		Adj3-1;
geal-liath		Adj1-1;	 ! Grammar::(gsm -léith, gsf & comp -léithe, npl~a)
ionadúil		Adj2-1;
mórshách		Adj1-5;	 ! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -áiche, npl ~a)
nuaidh		Adj2-2;
ointeolaíoch		Adj1-4;	 ! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -íche, npl ~a)
scothramhar		Adj4-1;	 ! Grammar::(gsm -air, gsf -thraimhre, npl -mhra)
sliochtmhar		Adj1-2;
LEXICON Adj-FGB2
aindílis		Adj4-3;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf, npl & comp -ílse)
aisfhillteach		Adj1-3;
anacair		Adj4-4;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf, npl & comp -cra)
anumhal		Adj4-2;	! Grammar::(gsm -ail, gsf & comp -aile, npl -mhla)
beag		Adj1-1;	! Grammar::(gsm big, gsf bige, npl ~a, complú)
béal-anróch		Adj1-5;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf & comp -óiche, npl ~a)
bléinfhairsing		Adj2-2;
bodhar		Adj4-2;	! Grammar::(gsm -air, gsf & comp -aire, npl-dhra)
bunaíoch		Adj1-4;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -íche, npl ~a)
camrúil		Adj2-1;
céadmhadh		Adj1-2;
ceannramhar		Adj4-1;	! Grammar::(gsm -air, gsf & comp -nnraimhre, npl-mhra)
comair		Adj4-3;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf, npl & comp coimre)
comhalta		Adj3-1;
crannramhar		Adj4-1;	! Grammar::(gsm -air, gsf & comp -aimhre, npl-mhra)
dealbh		Adj1-1;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf & comp deilbhe, pl ~a)
díleách		Adj1-5;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf & comp -áiche, npl ~a)
dúdheacair		Adj4-4;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf, npl & comp -eacra)
easumhal		Adj4-2;	! Grammar::(gsm -ail, gsf & comp -aile, npl -mhla)
eisionraic		Adj2-2;
feidhil		Adj4-3;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf, npl & comp -dhle)
fiar		Adj1-1;	! Grammar::(gsm féir, gsf & comp féire, npl ~a)
focheannasach		Adj1-3;
fonnghlas		Adj1-2;
fuasnaidhe		Adj3-1;
gnóisíoch		Adj1-4;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf & comp -íche, npl ~a)
gráiciúil		Adj2-1;
heirpéach		Adj1-5;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -éiche, npl ~a)
lámhfholamh		Adj4-1;	! Grammar::(gsm -aimh, gsf & comp -oilmhe, npl-lmha)
leathchaoch		Adj1-1;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -oiche, npl ~a)
meán-ard		Adj1-2;
meiteasóch		Adj1-5;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -óiche, npl ~a)
míshocair		Adj4-4;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf, npl & comp -cra)
neamhíoctha		Adj3-1;
obthach		Adj1-3;
palatúil		Adj2-1;
prótasóch		Adj1-5;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -óiche, npl ~a)
rannaíoch		Adj1-4;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -íche, npl ~a)
righin		Adj4-3;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf, npl & comp -ghne)
socair		Adj4-4;	! Grammar::(gsf, npl & comp -cra)
sochraidh		Adj2-2;
solamh		Adj1-2;
teann		Adj1-1;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf & comp teinne, npl ~a)
treóch		Adj1-5;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf -óiche, npl ~a)
triamhain		Adj4-4;	! Grammar::(gsm ~, gsf & comp -mhna2)
LEXICON AdjEqualVariants	
achmair		Adj4-3;		! Entry: achmair = achomair.
adhbhal		Adj4-1;		! Entry: adhbhal = ábhal.
anfhásta		Adj3-1;		! Entry: anfhás, ~ta = anás, -ta.
cloithir		Adj2-2;		! Entry: cloithir = cluthar. *** ???
déidheannach		Adj1-3;		! Entry: déidhean(n)ach = déanach.
deocair		Adj4-4;		! Entry: deocair = deacair.
díomuíoch		Adj1-4;		! Entry: díomuíoch = diomaíoch.
dulbhair		Adj4-3;		! Entry: dulbhair = doilbhir.
eirciúil		Adj2-1;		! Entry: eirceach, eirciúil = eiriceach, eiriciúil.
eitir		Adj4-4;		! Entry: eitir = otair.
falamh		Adj4-1;		! Entry: falamh, ~aigh = folamh, folmhaigh.
oitir		Adj4-4;		! Entry: oitir = otair.
tár		Adj1-2;		! Entry: tár, f = táir.
tiugh		Adj1-1;		! Entry: tiugh = tiubh.
LEXICON AdjVariants
ársata		Adj3-1;	! Headword: ársanta (a3); (Var: ársata)
deánfasach		Adj1-3;	! Headword: déanfasach (a1); (Var: deánfasach)
diardain		Adj2-2;	! Headword: diardanach (a1); (Var: diardain a1)
drochbhéasúil		Adj2-1;	! Headword: drochbhéasach (a1); (Var: drochbhéasúil a2)
